South Dakota, session 2026, SB11.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA:
Section 1. That § 32-35-47.1 be AMENDED:
32-35-47.1. Any person whose license or privilege to drive a motor vehicle on
public highways is suspended pursuant to this chapter must pay the reinstatement fee,
pursuant to subsection 32-12-47.1(1)(f), to the department prior to the reinstatement of
the license.
Section 2. That § 32-35-101 be AMENDED:
32-35-101. The department shall furnish to any person, upon request, a certified
abstract of the operating record for the last three years of any person subject to the
provisions of this chapter. The three-year limit does not apply to a person requesting the
person's own abstract. The abstract must include enumeration of any motor vehicle
accidents in which the person has been involved and reference to any convictions of the
person for a violation of the motor vehicle laws, as reported to the department.
No accident may be entered on the driving record of a law enforcement officer,
firefighter, or emergency medical technician if the accident occurred while the law
enforcement officer, firefighter, or emergency medical technician was lawfully engaged in
the performance of official duties and was driving an emergency vehicle. The accident
must be recorded separately.
No accident may be entered on the driving record of an operator of emergency
snow removal equipment if the accident resulted from the operator's response to an
emergency call of duty and the operator was lawfully engaged in the performance of
official duties in support of an emergency call of duty by a law enforcement officer,
firefighter, or emergency medical technician and was driving official snow removal
equipment. The accident must be recorded separately.

26.403.12 2 11
The department shall collect seven dollars for each abstract. The fee must be
credited to the state motor vehicle fund. Any governmental entity or subdivision is exempt
from this fee.
SB11 ENROLLED

26.403.12 3 11
An Act to increase reinstatement fees and abstract driver record fees.
Received at this Executive Office
I certify that the attached Act originated in this _____ day of _____________,
the:
2026 at ____________M.
Senate as Bill No. 11
By
Secretary of the Senate for the Governor
The attached Act is hereby
approved this ________ day of
President of the Senate ______________, A.D., 2026
Attest:
Governor
Secretary of the Senate
STATE OF SOUTH DAKOTA,
ss.
Office of the Secretary of State
Speaker of the House
Filed ____________, 2026
Attest: at _________ o'clock __M.
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of State
Senate Bill No. 11 By
File No. ____ Asst. Secretary of State
Chapter No. ______
SB11 ENROLLED